Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.235.230

Breakfast after the bell program—Funding for implementation. (Expires June 30, 2028.)

The office of the superintendent of public instruction, school districts, and affected schools shall implement sections 2 through 4, chapter 8, Laws of 2018 only in years in which funding is specifically provided for the purposes of chapter 8, Laws of 2018, referencing chapter 8, Laws of 2018 by bill or chapter number or statutory references, in a biennial or supplemental operating budget.

[ 2018 c 8 s 6.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2018 c 8 ss 3, 4, and 6: See note following RCW 28A.235.210.

Findings—Intent—Short title—2018 c 8: See notes following RCW 28A.235.210.